Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 3

Name

48-248-301. Name.

The name of a domestic PLLC and of a foreign PLLC registered in this state, in addition to satisfying the requirements of chapters 207 and 246 of this title (except the requirement that the name include the words “limited liability company” or “LLC”):

Must contain the words “professional limited company,” “professional limited liability company” or “professional LLC,” “limited liability professional company” or the abbreviations “P.L.C.,” “P.L.L.C.,” or such abbreviations without punctuation, or “L.L.P.C.” except in the case of a foreign PLLC, the name may contain, subject to subdivision (a)(2), and in lieu of the foregoing, the designations allowed by the jurisdiction in which the PLLC was formed or organized;

Must not contain the word “corporation” or “incorporated” or an abbreviation of either or both of these words;

May not contain language stating or implying that it is organized for a purpose other than that authorized by § 48-248-104 and its articles.

Chapters 207 and 246 of this title do not prevent the use of a name otherwise prohibited by those sections if it is the personal name of a member or former member of the domestic or foreign PLLC or the name of an individual who was associated with a predecessor of the PLLC.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 1995, ch. 403, § 91.